Selected Works of Mao Tse-tung



ON NEW DEMOCRACY


_January 1940_

I. WHITHER CHINA?

A lively atmosphere has prevailed throughout the country ever since the
War of Resistance began, there is a general feeling that a way out of
the impasse has been found, and people no longer knit their brows in
despair. Of late, however, the dust and din of compromise and
anti-communism have once again filled the air, and once again the people
are thrown into bewilderment. Most susceptible, and the first to be
affected, are the intellectuals and the young students. The question
once again arises: What is to be done? Whither China? On the occasion of
the publication of _Chinese Culture,_[1] it may therefore be profitable
to clarify the political and cultural trends in the country. I am a
layman in matters of culture; I would like to study them, but have only
just begun to do so. Fortunately, there are many comrades in Yenan who
have written at length in this field, so that my rough and ready words
may serve the same purpose as the beating of the gongs before a
theatrical performance. Our observations may contain a grain of truth
for the nation's advanced cultural workers and may serve as a modest
spur to induce them to come forward with valuable contributions of their
own, and we hope that they will join in the discussion to reach correct
conclusions which will meet our national needs. To "seek truth from
facts" is the scientific approach, and presumptuously to claim
infallibility and lecture people will never settle anything. The
troubles that have befallen our nation are extremely serious, and only a
scientific approach and a spirit of responsibility can lead it on to the
road of liberation. There is but one truth, and the question of whether
or not one has arrived at it depends not on subjective boasting but on
objective practice. The only yardstick of truth is the revolutionary
practice of millions of people. This, I think, can be regarded as the
attitude of _Chinese Culture._

II. WE WANT TO BUILD A NEW CHINA

For many years we Communists have struggled for a cultural revolution as
well as for a political and economic revolution, and our aim is to build
a new society and a new state for the Chinese nation. That new society
and new state will have not only a new politics and a new economy but a
new culture. In other words, not only do we want to change a China that
is politically oppressed and economically exploited into a China that is
politically free and economically prosperous, we also want to change the
China which is being kept ignorant and backward under the sway of the
old culture into an enlightened and progressive China under the sway of
a new culture. In short, we want to build a new China. Our aim in the
cultural sphere is to build a new Chinese national culture.

III. CHINA'S HISTORICAL CHARACTERISTICS

We want to build a new national culture, but what kind of culture should
it be?

Any given culture (as an ideological form) is a reflection of the
politics and economics of a given society, and the former in turn has a
tremendous influence and effect upon the latter; economics is the base
and politics the concentrated expression of economics.[2] This is our
fundamental view of the relation of culture to politics and economics
and of the relation of politics to economics. It follows that the form
of culture is first determined by the political and economic form, and
only then does it operate on and influence the given political and
economic form. Marx says, "It is not the consciousness of men that
determines their being, but, on the contrary, their social being that
determines their consciousness."[3] He also says, "The philosophers have
only _interpreted_ the world, in various ways; the point, however, is to
_change_ it."[4] For the first time in human history, these scientific
formulations correctly solved the problem of the relationship between
consciousness and existence, and they are the basic concepts underlying
the dynamic revolutionary theory of knowledge as the reflection of
reality which was later elaborated so profoundly by Lenin. These basic
concepts must be kept in mind in our discussion of China's cultural
problems.

Thus it is quite clear that the reactionary elements of the old national
culture we want to eliminate are inseparable from the old national
politics and economics, while the new national culture which we want to
build up is inseparable from the new national politics and economics.
The old politics and economics of the Chinese nation form the basis of
its old culture, just as its new politics and economics will form the
basis of its new culture.

What are China's old politics and economics? And what is her old
culture?

From the Chou and Chin Dynasties onwards, Chinese society was feudal, as
were its politics and its economy. And the dominant culture, reflecting
the politics and economy, was feudal culture.

Since the invasion of foreign capitalism and the gradual growth of
capitalist elements in Chinese society, the country has changed by
degrees into a colonial, semi-colonial and semi-feudal society. China
today is colonial in the Japanese-occupied areas and basically
semi-colonial in the Kuomintang areas, and it is predominantly feudal or
semi-feudal in both. Such, then, is the character of present-day Chinese
society and the state of affairs in our country. The politics and the
economy of this society are predominantly colonial, semi-colonial and
semi-feudal, and the predominant culture, reflecting the politics and
economy, is also colonial, semi-colonial and semi-feudal.

It is precisely against these predominant political, economic and
cultural forms that our revolution is directed. What we want to get rid
of is the old colonial, semi-colonial and semi-feudal politics and
economy and the old culture in their service. And what we want to build
up is their direct opposite, _i.e.,_ the new politics, the new economy
and the new culture of the Chinese nation.

What, then, are the new politics and the new economy of the Chinese
nation, and what is its new culture?

In the course of its history the Chinese revolution must go through two
stages, first, the democratic revolution, and second, the socialist
revolution, and by their very nature they are two different
revolutionary processes. Here democracy does not belong to the old
category-- it is not the old democracy, but belongs to the new
category--it is New Democracy.

It can thus be affirmed that China's new politics are the politics of
New Democracy, that China's new economy is the economy of New Democracy
and that China's new culture is the culture of New Democracy.

Such are the historical characteristics of the Chinese revolution at the
present time. Any political party, group or person taking part in the
Chinese revolution that fails to understand this will not be able to
direct the revolution and lead it to victory, but will be cast aside by
the people and left to grieve out in the cold.

IV. THE CHINESE REVOLUTION IS PART OF THE WORLD REVOLUTION

The historical characteristic of the Chinese revolution lies in its
division into the two stages, democracy and socialism, the first being
no longer democracy in general, but democracy of the Chinese type, a new
and special type, namely, New Democracy. How, then, has this historical
characteristic come into being? Has it been in existence for the past
hundred years, or is it of recent origin?

A brief study of the historical development of China and of the world
shows that this characteristic did not emerge immediately after the
Opium War, but took shape later, after the first imperialist world war
and the October Revolution in Russia. Let us now examine the process of
its formation.

Clearly, it follows from the colonial, semi-colonial and semi-feudal
character of present-day Chinese society that the Chinese revolution
must be divided into two stages. The first step is to change the
colonial, semi-colonial and semi-feudal form of society into an
independent, democratic society. The second is to carry the revolution
forward and build a socialist society. At present the Chinese revolution
is taking the first step.

The preparatory period for the first step began with the opium War in
1840, _i.e._, when China's feudal society started changing into a
semi-colonial and semi-feudal one. Then came the Movement of the Taiping
Heavenly Kingdom, the Sino-French War, the Sino-Japanese war, the Reform
Movement of 1898, the Revolution of 1911, the May 4th Movement, the
Northern Expedition, the War of the Agrarian Revolution and the present
War of Resistance Against Japan. Together these have taken up a whole
century and in a sense they represent that first step, being struggles
waged by the Chinese people, on different occasions and in varying
degrees, against imperialism and the feudal forces in order to build up
an independent, democratic society and complete the first revolution.
The Revolution of 1911 was in a fuller sense the beginning of that
revolution. In its social character, this revolution is a
bourgeois-democratic and not a proletarian-socialist revolution. It is
still unfinished and still demands great efforts, because to this day
its enemies are still very strong. When Dr. Sun Yat-sen said, "The
revolution is not yet completed, all my comrades must struggle on", he
was referring to the bourgeois-democratic revolution.

A change, however, occurred in China's bourgeois-democratic revolution
after the outbreak of the first imperialist world war in 1914 and the
founding of a socialist state on one-sixth of the globe as a result of
the Russian October Revolution of 1917.

Before these events, the Chinese bourgeois-democratic revolution came
within the old category of the bourgeois-democratic world revolution, of
which it was a part.

Since these events, the Chinese bourgeois-democratic revolution has
changed, it has come within the new category of bourgeois-democratic
revolutions and, as far as the alignment of revolutionary forces is
concerned, forms part of the proletarian-socialist world revolution.

Why? Because the first imperialist world war and the first victorious
socialist revolution, the October Revolution, have changed the whole
course of world history and ushered in a new era.

It is an era in which the world capitalist front has collapsed in one
part of the globe (one-sixth of the world) and has fully revealed its
decadence everywhere else, in which the remaining capitalist parts
cannot survive without relying more than ever on the colonies and
Semi-colonies, in which a socialist state has been established and has
proclaimed its readiness to give active support to the liberation
movement of all colonies and semi-colonies, and in which the proletariat
of the capitalist countries is steadily freeing itself from the
social-imperialist influence of the social-democratic parties and has
proclaimed its support for the liberation movement in the colonies and
semi-colonies. In this era, any revolution in a colony or semi-colony
that is directed against imperialism, _i.e.,_ against the international
bourgeoisie or international capitalism, no longer comes within the old
category of the bourgeois-democratic world revolution, but within the
new category. It is no longer part of the old bourgeois, or capitalist,
world revolution, but is part of the new world revolution, the
proletarian-socialist world revolution. Such revolutionary colonies and
semi-colonies can no longer be regarded as allies of the counter
revolutionary front of world capitalism; they have become allies of the
revolutionary front of world socialism.

Although such a revolution in a colonial and semi-colonial country is
still fundamentally bourgeois-democratic in its social character during
its first stage or first step, and although its objective mission is to
clear the path for the development of capitalism, it is no longer a
revolution of the old type led by the bourgeoisie with the aim of
establishing a capitalist society and a state under bourgeois
dictatorship. It belongs to the new type of revolution led by the
proletariat with the aim, in the first stage, of establishing a
new-democratic society and a state under the joint dictatorship of all
the revolutionary classes. Thus this revolution actually serves the
purpose of clearing a still wider path for the development of socialism.
In the course of its progress, there may be a number of further
sub-stages, because of changes on the enemy's side and within the ranks
of our allies, but the fundamental character of the revolution remains
unchanged.

Such a revolution attacks imperialism at its very roots, and is
therefore not tolerated but opposed by imperialism. However, it is
favoured by socialism and supported by the land of socialism and the
socialist international proletariat.

Therefore, such a revolution inevitably becomes part of the
proletarian-socialist world revolution.

The correct thesis that "the Chinese revolution is part of the world
revolution" was put forward as early as 1924-27 during the period of
China's First Great Revolution. It was put forward by the Chinese
Communists and endorsed by all those taking part in the anti-imperialist
and anti-feudal struggle of the time. However, the significance of this
thesis was not fully expounded in those days, and consequently it was
only vaguely understood.

The "world revolution" no longer refers to the old world revolution, for
the old bourgeois world revolution has long been a thing of the past, it
refers to the new world revolution, the socialist world revolution.
Similarly, to form "part of" means to form part not of the old bourgeois
but of the new socialist revolution. This is a tremendous change
unparalleled in the history of China and of the world.

This correct thesis advanced by the Chinese Communists is based on
Stalin's theory.

As early as 1918, in an article commemorating the first anniversary of
the October Revolution, Stalin wrote:

The great world-wide significance of the October Revolution chiefly
consists in the fact that:

1) It has widened the scope of the national question and converted it
from the particular question of combating national oppression in Europe
into the general question of emancipating the oppressed peoples,
colonies and semi-colonies from imperialism;

2) It has opened up wide possibilities for their emancipation and the
right paths towards it, has thereby greatly facilitated the cause of the
emancipation of the oppressed peoples of the West and the East, and has
drawn them into the common current of the victorious struggle against
imperialism;

3) _It has thereby erected a bridge between the socialist West and the
enslaved East,_ having created a new front of revolutions _against_
world imperialism, extending from the proletarians of the West, through
the Russian Revolution, to the oppressed peoples of the East.[5]

Since writing this article, Stalin has again and again expounded the
theory that revolutions in the colonies and semi-colonies have broken
away from the old category and become part of the proletarian-socialist
revolution. The clearest and most precise explanation is given in an
article published on June _3o,_ 1925, in which Stalin carried on a
controversy with the Yugoslav nationalists of the time. Entitled "The
National Question Once Again", it is included in a book translated by
Chang Chung-shih and published under the title _Stalin on the National
Question._ It contains the following passage:

Semich refers to a passage in Stalin's pamphlet _Marxism and the
National Question,_ written at the end of 1912. There it says that "the
national struggle under the conditions of _rising_ capitalism is a
struggle of the bourgeois classes among themselves". Evidently, by this
Semich is trying to suggest that his formula defining the social
significance of the national movement under the present historical
conditions is correct. But Stalin's pamphlet was written before the
imperialist war, when the national question was not yet regarded by
Marxists as a question of world significance, when the Marxists'
fundamental demand for the right to self-determination was regarded not
as part of the proletarian revolution, but as part of the
bourgeois-democratic revolution. It would be ridiculous not to see that
since then the international situation has radically changed, that the
war, on the one hand, and the October Revolution in Russia, on the
other, transformed the national question from a part of the
bourgeois-democratic revolution into a part of the proletarian-socialist
revolution. As far back as October 1916, in his article, "The Discussion
on Self-Determination Summed Up", Lenin said that the main point of the
national question, the right to self-determination, had ceased to be a
part of the general democratic movement, that it had already become a
component part of the general proletarian, socialist revolution. I do
not even mention subsequent works on the national question by Lenin and
by other representatives of Russian communism. After all this, what
significance can Semich's reference to the passage in Stalin's pamphlet,
written in the period of the _bourgeois-_democratic revolution in
Russia, have at the present time, when, as a consequence of the new
historical situation, we have entered a new epoch, the epoch of
_proletarian_ revolution? It can only signify that Semich quotes outside
of space and time, without reference to the living historical situation,
and thereby violates the most elementary requirements of dialectics, and
ignores the fact that what is right for one historical situation may
prove to be wrong in another historical situation.[6]

From this it can be seen that there are two kinds of world revolution,
the first belonging to the bourgeois or capitalist category. The era of
this kind of world revolution is long past, having come to an end as far
back as 1914 when the first imperialist world war broke out, and more
particularly in 1917 when the October Revolution took place. The second
kind, namely, the proletarian-socialist world revolution, thereupon
began. This revolution has the proletariat of the capitalist countries
as its main force and the oppressed peoples of the colonies and
semi-colonies as its allies. No matter what classes, parties or
individuals in an oppressed nation join the revolution, and no matter
whether they themselves are conscious of the point or understand it, so
long as they oppose imperialism, their revolution becomes part of the
proletarian-socialist world revolution and they become its allies.

Today, the Chinese revolution has taken on still greater significance.
This is a time when the economic and political crises of capitalism are
dragging the world more and more deeply into the Second World War, when
the Soviet Union has reached the period of transition from socialism to
communism and is capable of leading and helping the proletariat and
oppressed nations of the whole world in their fight against imperialist
war and capitalist reaction, when the proletariat of the capitalist
countries is preparing to overthrow capitalism and establish socialism,
and when the proletariat, the peasantry, the intelligentsia and other
sections of the petty bourgeoisie in China have become a mighty
independent political force under the leadership of the Chinese
Communist Party. Situated as we are in this day and age, should we not
make the appraisal that the Chinese revolution has taken on still
greater world significance? I think we should. The Chinese revolution
has become a very important part of the world revolution.

Although the Chinese revolution in this first stage (with its many
sub-stages) is a new type of bourgeois-democratic revolution and is not
yet itself a proletarian-socialist revolution in its social character,
it has long become a part of the proletarian-socialist world revolution
and is now even a very important part and a great ally of this world
revolution. The first step or stage in our revolution is definitely not,
and cannot be, the establishment of a capitalist society under the
dictatorship of the Chinese bourgeoisie, but will result in the
establishment of a new-democratic society under the joint dictatorship
of all the revolutionary classes of China headed by the Chinese
proletariat The revolution will then be carried forward to the second
stage, in which a socialist society will be established in China.

This is the fundamental characteristic of the Chinese revolution of
today, of the new revolutionary process of the past twenty years
(counting from the May 4th Movement of 1919), and its concrete living
essence.

V. THE POLITICS OF NEW DEMOCRACY

The new historical characteristic of the Chinese revolution is its
division into two stages, the first being the new-democratic revolution.
How does this manifest itself concretely in internal political and
economic relations? Let us consider the question.

Before the May 4th Movement of 1919 (which occurred after the first
imperialist world war of 1914 the Russian October Revolution of 1917),
the petty bourgeoisie and the bourgeoisie (through their intellectuals)
were the political leaders of the bourgeois-democratic revolution. The
Chinese proletariat had not yet appeared on the political scene as an
awakened and independent class force, but participated in the revolution
only as a follower of the petty bourgeoisie and the bourgeoisie. Such
was the case with the proletariat at the time of the Revolution of 1911.

After the May 4th Movement, the political leader of China's
bourgeois-democratic revolution was no longer the bourgeoisie but the
proletariat, although the national bourgeoisie continued to take part in
the revolution. The Chinese proletariat rapidly became an awakened and
independent political force as a result of its maturing and of the
influence of the Russian Revolution. It was the Chinese Communist Party
that put forward the slogan "Down with imperialism" and the
thoroughgoing programme for the whole bourgeois-democratic revolution,
and it was the Chinese Communist Party alone that carried out the
Agrarian Revolution.

Being a bourgeoisie in a colonial and semi-colonial country and
oppressed by imperialism, the Chinese national bourgeoisie retains a
certain revolutionary quality at certain periods and to a certain
degree--even in the era of imperialism--in its opposition to the foreign
imperialists and the domestic governments of bureaucrats and warlords
(instances of opposition to the latter can be found in the periods of
the Revolution of 1911 and the Northern Expedition), and it may ally
itself with the proletariat and the petty bourgeoisie against such
enemies as it is ready to oppose. In this respect the Chinese
bourgeoisie differs from the bourgeoisie of old tsarist Russia. Since
tsarist Russia was a military-feudal imperialism which carried on
aggression against other countries, the Russian bourgeoisie was entirely
lacking in revolutionary quality. There, the task of the proletariat was
to oppose the bourgeoisie, not to unite with it. But China's national
bourgeoisie has a revolutionary quality at certain periods and to a
certain degree, because China is a colonial and semi-colonial country
which is a victim of aggression. Here, the task of the proletariat is to
form a united front with the national bourgeoisie against imperialism
and the bureaucrat and warlord governments without overlooking its
revolutionary quality.

At the same time, however, being a bourgeois class in a colonial and
semi-colonial country and so being extremely flabby economically and
politically, the Chinese national bourgeoisie also has another quality,
namely, a proneness to conciliation with the enemies of the revolution.
Even when it takes part in the revolution, it is unwilling to break with
imperialism completely and, moreover, it is closely associated with the
exploitation of the rural areas through land rent; thus it is neither
willing nor able to overthrow imperialism, and much less the feudal
forces, in a thorough way. So neither of the two basic problems or tasks
of China's bourgeois-democratic revolution can be solved or accomplished
by the national bourgeoisie. As for China's big bourgeoisie, which is
represented by the Kuomintang, all through the long period from 1927 to
1937 it nestled in the arms of the imperialists and formed an alliance
with the feudal forces against the revolutionary people. In 1927 and for
some time afterwards, the Chinese national bourgeoisie also followed the
counter-revolution. During the present anti-Japanese war, the section of
the big bourgeoisie represented by Wang Ching-wei has capitulated to the
enemy, which constitutes a fresh betrayal on the part of the big
bourgeoisie. In this respect, then, the bourgeoisie in China differs
from the earlier bourgeoisie of the European and American countries, and
especially of France. When the bourgeoisie in those countries, and
especially in France, was still in its revolutionary era, the bourgeois
revolution was comparatively thorough, whereas the bourgeoisie in China
lacks even this degree of thoroughness.

Possible participation in the revolution on the one hand and proneness
to conciliation with the enemies of the revolution on the other-- such
is the dual character of the Chinese bourgeoisie, it faces both ways
Even the bourgeoisie in European and American history had shared this
dual character. When confronted by a formidable enemy, they united with
the workers and peasants against him, but when the workers and peasants
awakened, they turned round to unite with the enemy against the workers
and peasants. This is a general rule applicable to the bourgeoisie
everywhere in the world, but the trait is more pronounced in the Chinese
bourgeoisie.

In China, it is perfectly clear that whoever can lead the people in
overthrowing imperialism and the forces of feudalism can win the
people's confidence, because these two, and especially imperialism, are
the mortal enemies of the people. Today, whoever can lead the people in
driving out Japanese imperialism and introducing democratic government
will be the saviours of the people. History has proved that the Chinese
bourgeoisie cannot fulfil this responsibility, which inevitably falls
upon the shoulders of the proletariat.

Therefore, the proletariat, the peasantry, the intelligentsia and the
other sections of the petty bourgeoisie undoubtedly constitute the basic
forces determining China's fate. These classes, some already awakened
and others in the process of awakening, will necessarily become the
basic components of the state and governmental structure in the
democratic republic of China, with the proletariat as the leading force.
The Chinese democratic republic which we desire to establish now must be
a democratic republic under the joint dictatorship of all
anti-imperialist and anti-feudal people led by the proletariat, that is,
a new-democratic republic, a republic of the genuinely revolutionary new
Three People's Principles with their Three Great Policies.

This new-democratic republic will be different from the old
European-American form of capitalist republic under bourgeois
dictatorship, which is the old democratic form and already out of date.
On the other hand, it will also be different from the socialist republic
of the Soviet type under the dictatorship of the proletariat which is
already flourishing in the U.S.S.R., and which, moreover, will be
established in all the capitalist countries and will undoubtedly become
the dominant form of state and governmental structure in all the
industrially advanced countries. However, for a certain historical
period, this form is not suitable for the revolutions in the colonial
and semi-colonial countries. During this period, therefore, a third form
of state must be adopted in the revolutions of all colonial and
semi-colonial countries, namely, the new-democratic republic. This form
suits a certain historical period and is therefore transitional;
nevertheless, it is a form which is necessary and cannot be dispensed
with.

Thus the numerous types of state system in the world can be reduced to
three basic kinds according to the class character of their political
power: (1) republics under bourgeois dictatorship; (2) republics under
the dictatorship of the proletariat; and (3) republics under the joint
dictatorship of several revolutionary classes.

The first kind comprises the old democratic states. Today, after the
outbreak of the second imperialist war, there is hardly a trace of
democracy in many of the capitalist countries, which have come or are
coming under the bloody militarist dictatorship of the bourgeoisie.
Certain countries under the joint dictatorship of the landlords and the
bourgeoisie can be grouped with this kind.

The second kind exists in the Soviet Union, and the conditions for its
birth are ripening in capitalist countries. In the future, it will be
the dominant form throughout the world for a certain period.

The third kind is the transitional form of state to be adopted in the
revolutions of the colonial and semi-colonial countries. Each of these
revolutions will necessarily have specific characteristics of its own,
but these will be minor variations on a general theme. So long as they
are revolutions in colonial or semi-colonial countries, their state and
governmental structure will of necessity be basically the same, _i.e._,
a new-democratic state under the joint dictatorship of several
anti-imperialist classes. In present-day China, the anti-Japanese united
front represents the new-democratic form of state. It is anti-Japanese
and anti-imperialist; it is also a united front, an alliance of several
revolutionary classes. But unfortunately, despite the fact that the war
has been going on for so long, the work of introducing democracy has
hardly started in most of the country outside the democratic
anti-Japanese base areas under the leadership of the Communist Party,
and the Japanese imperialists have exploited this fundamental weakness
to stride into our country. If nothing is done about it, our national
future will be gravely imperilled.

The question under discussion here is that of the "state system". After
several decades of wrangling since the last years of the Ching Dynasty,
it has still not been cleared up. Actually it is simply a question of
the status of the various social classes within the state. The
bourgeoisie, as a rule, conceals the problem of class status and carries
out its one-class dictatorship under the "national" label. Such
concealment is of no advantage to the revolutionary people and the
matter should be clearly explained to them. The term "national" is all
right, but it must not include counter-revolutionaries and traitors. The
kind of state we need today is a dictatorship of all the revolutionary
classes over the counter-revolutionaries and traitors.

The so-called democratic system in modern states is usually monopolized
by the bourgeoisie and has become simply an instrument for oppressing
the common people. On the other hand, the Kuomintang's Principle of
Democracy means a democratic system shared by all the common people and
not privately owned by the few.

Such was the solemn declaration made in the Manifesto of the First
National Congress of the Kuomintang, held in 1924 during the period of
Kuomintang-Communist co-operation. For sixteen years the Kuomintang has
violated this declaration and as a result it has created the present
grave national crisis. This is a gross blunder, which we hope the
Kuomintang will correct in the cleansing flames of the anti-Japanese
war.

As for the question of "the system of government", this is a matter of
how political power is organized, the form in which one social class or
another chooses to arrange its apparatus of political power to oppose
its enemies and protect itself. There is no state which does not have an
appropriate apparatus of political power to represent it. China may now
adopt a system of people's congresses, from the national people's
congress down to the provincial, county, district and township people's
congresses, with all levels electing their respective governmental
bodies. But if there is to be a proper representation for each
revolutionary class according to its status in the state, a proper
expression of the people's will, a proper direction for revolutionary
struggles and a proper manifestation of the spirit of New Democracy,
then a system of really universal and equal suffrage, irrespective of
sex, creed, property or education, must be introduced. Such is the
system of democratic centralism. Only a government based on democratic
centralism can fully express the will of all the revolutionary people
and fight the enemies of the revolution most effectively. There must be
a spirit of refusal to be "privately owned by the few" in the government
and the army; without a genuinely democratic system this cannot be
attained and the system of government and the state system will be out
of harmony.

The state system, a joint dictatorship of all the revolutionary classes
and the system of government, democratic centralism--these constitute
the politics of New Democracy, the republic of New Democracy, the
republic of the anti-Japanese united front, the republic of the new
Three People's Principles with their Three Great Policies' the Republic
of China in reality as well as in name. Today we have a Republic of
China in name but not in reality, and our present task is to create the
reality that will fit the name.

Such are the internal political relations which a revolutionary China, a
China fighting Japanese aggression, should and must establish without
fail; such is the orientation, the only correct orientation, for our
present work of national reconstruction.

VI. THE ECONOMY OF NEW DEMOCRACY

If such a republic is to be established in China, it must be
new-democratic not only in its politics but also in its economy.

It will own the big banks and the big industrial and commercial
enterprises.

Enterprises, such as banks, railways and airlines, whether Chinese-owned
or foreign-owned, which are either monopolistic in character or too big
for private management, shall be operated and administered by the state,
so that private capital cannot dominate the livelihood of the people:
this is the main principle of the regulation of capital.

This is another solemn declaration in the Manifesto of the Kuomintang's
First National Congress held during the period of Kuomintang-Communist
co-operation, and it is the correct policy for the economic structure of
the new-democratic republic. In the new-democratic republic under the
leadership of the proletariat, the state enterprises will be of a
socialist character and will constitute the leading force in the whole
national economy, but the republic will neither confiscate capitalist
private property in general nor forbid the development of such
capitalist production as does not "dominate the livelihood of the
people", for China's economy is still very backward.

The republic will take certain necessary steps to confiscate the land of
the landlords and distribute it to those peasants having little or no
land, carry out Dr. Sun Yat-sen's slogan of "land to the tiller",
abolish feudal relations in the rural areas, and turn the land over to
the private ownership of the peasants. A rich peasant economy will be
allowed in the rural areas. Such is the policy of "equalization of
landownership". "Land to the tiller" is the correct slogan for this
policy. In general, socialist agriculture will not be established at
this stage, though various types of co-operative enterprises developed
on the basis of "land to the tiller" will contain elements of socialism.

China's economy must develop along the path of the "regulation of
capital" and the "equalization of landownership", and must never be
"privately owned by the few"; we must never permit the few capitalists
and landlords to "dominate the livelihood of the people"; we must never
establish a capitalist society of the European-American type or allow
the old semi-feudal society to survive. Whoever dares to go counter to
this line of advance will certainly not succeed but will run into a
brick wall.

Such are the internal economic relations which a revolutionary China, a
China fighting Japanese aggression, must and necessarily will establish.

Such is the economy of New Democracy.

And the politics of New Democracy are the concentrated expression of the
economy of New Democracy.

VII. REFUTATION OF BOURGEOIS DICTATORSHIP

More than 90 per cent of the people are in favour of a republic of this
kind with its new-democratic politics and new-democratic economy; there
is no alternative road.

What about the road to a capitalist society under bourgeois
dictatorship? To be sure, that was the old road taken by the European
and American bourgeoisie, but whether one likes it or not, neither the
international nor the domestic situation allows China to do the same.

Judging by the international situation, that road is blocked. In its
fundamentals, the present international situation is one of a struggle
between capitalism and socialism, in which capitalism is on the
downgrade and socialism on the upgrade. In the first place international
capitalism, or imperialism, will not permit the establishment in China
of a capitalist society under bourgeois dictatorship. Indeed the history
of modern China is a history of imperialist aggression, of imperialist
opposition to China's independence and to her development of capitalism.
Earlier revolutions failed in China because imperialism strangled them,
and innumerable revolutionary martyrs died, bitterly lamenting the
non-fulfilment of their mission. Today a powerful Japanese imperialism
is forcing its way into China and wants to reduce her to a colony; it is
not China that is developing Chinese capitalism but Japan that is
developing Japanese capitalism in our country; and it is not the Chinese
bourgeoisie but the Japanese bourgeoisie that is exercising dictatorship
in our country. True enough, this is the period of the final struggle of
dying imperialism--imperialism is "moribund capitalism".[7] But just
because it is dying, it is all the more dependent on colonies and
semi-colonies for survival and will certainly not allow any colony or
semi-colony to establish anything like a capitalist society under the
dictatorship of its own bourgeoisie. Just because Japanese imperialism
is bogged down in serious economic and political crises, just because it
is dying, it must invade China and reduce her to a colony, thereby
blocking the road to bourgeois dictatorship and national capitalism in
China.

In the second place, socialism will not permit it. All the imperialist
powers in the world are our enemies, and China cannot possibly gain her
independence without the assistance of the land of socialism and the
international proletariat. That is, she cannot do so without the help of
the Soviet Union and the help which the proletariat of Japan, Britain,
the United States, France, Germany, Italy and other countries provide
through their struggles against capitalism. Although no one can say that
the victory of the Chinese revolution must wait upon the victory of the
revolution in all of these countries, or in one or two of them, there is
no doubt that we cannot win without the added strength of their
proletariat. In particular, Soviet assistance is absolutely
indispensable for China's final victory in the War of Resistance. Refuse
Soviet assistance, and the revolution will fail. Don't the anti-Soviet
campaigns from 1927 onwards [8] provide an extraordinarily clear lesson?
The world today is in a new era of wars and revolutions, an era in which
capitalism is unquestionably dying and socialism is unquestionably
prospering. In these circumstances, would it not be sheer fantasy to
desire the establishment in China of a capitalist society under
bourgeois dictatorship after the defeat of imperialism and feudalism?

Even though the petty Kemalist dictatorship of the bourgeoisie [9] did
emerge in Turkey after the first imperialist world war and the October
Revolution owing to certain specific conditions (the bourgeoisie's
success in repelling Greek aggression and the weakness of the
proletariat), there can be no second Turkey, much less a "Turkey" with a
population of 450 million, after World War II and the accomplishment of
socialist construction in the Soviet Union. In the specific conditions
of China (the flabbiness of the bourgeoisie with its proneness to
conciliation and the strength of the proletariat with its revolutionary
thoroughness), things just never work out so easily as in Turkey. Did
not some members of the Chinese bourgeoisie clamour for Kemalism after
the First Great Revolution failed in 1927? But where is China's Kemal?
And where are China's bourgeois dictatorship and capitalist society?
Besides, even Kemalist Turkey eventually had to throw herself into the
arms of Anglo-French imperialism, becoming more and more of a
semi-colony and part of the reactionary imperialist world. In the
international situation of today, the "heroes"' in the colonies and
semi-colonies either line up on the imperialist front and become part of
the forces of world counter-revolution, or they line up on the
anti-imperialist front and become part of the forces of world
revolution. They must do one or the other, for there is no third choice.

Judging by the domestic situation, too, the Chinese bourgeoisie should
have learned its lesson by now. No sooner had the strength of the
proletariat and of the peasant and other petty bourgeois masses brought
the revolution of 1927 to victory than the capitalist class, headed by
the big bourgeoisie, kicked the masses aside, seized the fruits of the
revolution, formed a counter-revolutionary alliance with imperialism and
the feudal forces, and strained themselves to the limit in a war of
"Communist suppression" for ten years. But what was the upshot? Today,
when a powerful enemy has penetrated deep into our territory and the
anti-Japanese war has been going on for two years, is it possible that
there are still people who want to copy the obsolete recipes of the
European and American bourgeoisie? A decade was spent on "suppressing
the Communists" out of existence, but no capitalist society under
bourgeois dictatorship was "suppressed" into existence. Is it possible
that there are still people who want to have another try? True, a
"one-party dictatorship" was "suppressed" into existence through the
decade of "Communist suppression", but it is a semi-colonial and
semi-feudal dictatorship. What is more, at the end of four years of
"Communist suppression" (from 1927 to the Incident of September 18,
1931), "Manchukuo" was "suppressed" into existence and in 1937, after
another six years of such "suppression", the Japanese imperialists made
their way into China south of the Great Wall. Today if anyone wants to
carry on "suppression" for another decade, it would mean a new type of
"Communist suppression", somewhat different from the old. But is there
not one fleet-footed person who has already outstripped everyone else
and boldly undertaken this new enterprise of "Communist suppression"?
Yes, Wang Ching-wei, who has become the new-style anti-Communist
celebrity. Anyone who wishes to join his gang can please himself; but
wouldn't that turn out to be an added embarrassment when talking big
about bourgeois dictatorship, capitalist society, Kemalism, a modern
state, a one-party dictatorship, "one doctrine", and so on and so forth?
And if, instead of joining the Wang Ching-wei gang, someone wants to
come into the "fight Japan" camp of the people but imagines that once
the war is won he will be able to kick aside the people fighting Japan,
seize the fruits of the victory of the fight against Japan and establish
a "perpetual one-party dictatorship", isn't he just daydreaming? "Fight
Japan!" "Fight Japan!" But who is doing the fighting? Without the
workers and the peasants and other sections of the petty bourgeoisie,
you cannot move a step. Anyone who still dares to try and kick them
aside will himself be crushed. Hasn't this, too, become a matter of
common sense? But the die-hards among the Chinese bourgeoisie (I am
referring solely to the die-hards) seem to have learned nothing in the
past twenty years. Aren't they still shouting: "Restrict communism",
"Corrode communism" and "Combat communism"? Haven't we seen "Measures
for Restricting the Activities of Alien Parties" followed by "Measures
for Dealing with the Alien Party Problem" and still later by "Directives
for Dealing with the Alien Party Problem"? Heavens! With all this
"restricting" and "dealing with" going on, one wonders what kind of
future they are preparing for our nation and for themselves! We
earnestly and sincerely advise these gentlemen: Open your eyes, take a
good look at China and the world, see how things stand inside as well as
outside the country, and do not repeat your mistakes. If you persist in
your mistakes, the future of our nation will of course be disastrous,
but I am sure things will not go well with you either. This is
absolutely true, absolutely certain. Unless the die-hards among the
Chinese bourgeoisie wake up, their future will be far from bright--they
will only bring about their own destruction. Therefore we hope that
China's anti-Japanese united front will be maintained and that, with the
cooperation of all instead of the monopoly of a single clique, the
anti-Japanese cause will be brought to victory; it is the only good
policy-- any other policy is bad. This is the sincere advice we
Communists are giving, and do not blame us for not having forewarned
you.

"If there is food, let everyone share it." This old Chinese saying
contains much truth. Since we all share in fighting the enemy, we should
all share in eating, we should all share in the work to be done, and we
should all share access to education. Such attitudes as "I and I alone
will take everything" and "no one dare harm me" are nothing but the old
tricks of feudal lords which simply will not work in the Nineteen
Forties.

We Communists will never push aside anyone who is revolutionary; we
shall persevere in the united front and practice long-term co-operation
with all those classes, strata, political parties and groups and
individuals that are willing to fight Japan to the end. But it will not
do if certain people want to push aside the Communist Party. it will not
do if they want to split the united front. China must keep on fighting
Japan, uniting and moving forward, and we cannot tolerate anyone who
tries to capitulate, cause splits or move backward.

VIII. REFUTATION OF "LEFT" PHRASE-MONGERING

If the capitalist road of bourgeois dictatorship is out of the question,
then is it possible to take the socialist road of proletarian
dictatorship?

No, that is not possible either.

Without a doubt, the present revolution is the first step, which will
develop into the second step, that of socialism, at a later date. And
China will attain true happiness only when she enters the socialist era.
But today is not yet the time to introduce socialism. The present task
of the revolution in China is to fight imperialism and feudalism, and
socialism is out of the question until this task is completed. The
Chinese revolution cannot avoid taking the two steps, first of New
Democracy and then of socialism. Moreover, the first step will need
quite a long time and cannot be accomplished overnight. We are not
utopians and cannot divorce ourselves from the actual conditions
confronting us.

Certain malicious propagandists, deliberately confusing these two
distinct revolutionary stages, advocate the so-called theory of a single
revolution in order to prove that the Three People's Principles apply to
all kinds of revolutions and that communism therefore loses its _raison
d'être._ Utilizing this "theory", they frantically oppose communism and
the Communist Party, the Eighth Route and New Fourth Armies, and the
Shensi-Kansu-Ningsia Border Region. Their real purpose is to root out
all revolution, to oppose a thoroughgoing bourgeois-democratic
revolution and thoroughgoing resistance to Japan and to prepare public
opinion for their capitulation to the Japanese aggressors. This is
deliberately being fostered by the Japanese imperialists. Since their
occupation of Wuhan, they have come to realize that military force alone
cannot subjugate China and have therefore resorted to political
offensives and economic blandishments. Their political offensives
consist in tempting wavering elements in the anti-Japanese camp,
splitting the united front and undermining Kuomintang-Communist
co-operation. Their economic blandishments take the form of the
so-called joint industrial enterprises. In central and southern China
the Japanese aggressors are allowing Chinese capitalists to invest 51
per cent of the capital in such enterprises, with Japanese capital
making up the other 49 per cent; in northern China they are allowing
Chinese capitalists to invest 49 per cent of the capital, with Japanese
capital making up the other 51 per cent. The Japanese invaders have also
promised to restore the former assets of the Chinese capitalists to them
in the form of capital shares in the investment. At the prospect of
profits, some conscienceless capitalists forget all moral principles and
itch to have a go. One section, represented by Wang Ching-wei, has
already capitulated. Another section lurking in the anti-Japanese camp
would also like to cross over. But, with the cowardice of thieves, they
fear that the Communists will block their exit and, what is more, that
the common people will brand them as traitors. So they have put their
heads together and decided to prepare the ground in cultural circles and
through the press. Having determined on their policy, they have lost no
time in hiring some "metaphysics-mongers"[10] plus a few Trotskyites
who, brandishing their pens like lances, are tilting in all directions
and creating bedlam. Hence the whole bag of tricks for deceiving those
who do not know what is going on in the world around them--the "theory
of a single revolution", the tales that communism does not suit the
national conditions of China, that there is no need for a Communist
Party in China, that the Eighth Route and the New Fourth Armies are
sabotaging the anti-Japanese war and are merely moving about without
fighting, that the Shensi-Kansu-Ningsia Border Region is a feudal
separatist regime, that the Communist Party is disobedient, dissident,
intriguing and disruptive--and all for the purpose of providing the
capitalists with good grounds for getting their 49 or 51 per cent and
selling out the nation's interests to the enemy at the opportune moment.
This is "stealing the beams and pillars and replacing them with rotten
timbers",--preparing the public mind for their projected capitulation.
Thus, these gentlemen who, in all apparent seriousness, are pushing the
"theory of a single revolution" to oppose communism and the Communist
Party are out for nothing but their 49 or 51 per cent. How they must
have cudgelled their brains ! The "theory of a single revolution" is
simply a theory of no revolution at all, and that is the heart of the
matter.

But there are other people, apparently with no evil intentions, who are
misled by the "theory of a single revolution" and the fanciful notion of
"accomplishing both the political revolution and the social revolution
at one stroke"; they do not understand that our revolution is divided
into stages, that we can only proceed to the next stage of revolution
after accomplishing the first, and that there is no such thing as
"accomplishing both at one stroke". Their approach is likewise very
harmful because it confuses the steps to be taken in the revolution and
weakens the effort directed towards the current task. It is correct and
in accord with the Marxist theory of revolutionary development to say of
the two revolutionary stages that the first provides the conditions for
the second and that the two must be consecutive, without allowing any
intervening stage of bourgeois dictatorship. However, it is a utopian
view rejected by true revolutionaries to say that the democratic
revolution does not have a specific task and period of its own but can
be merged and accomplished simultaneously with another task, _i.e._, the
socialist task (which can only be carried out in another period), and
this is what they call "accomplishing both at one stroke".

IX. REFUTATION OF THE DIE-HARDS

The bourgeois die-hards in their turn come forward and say: "Well, you
Communists have postponed the socialist system to a later stage and have
declared, 'The Three People's Principles being what China needs today,
our Party is ready to fight for their complete realization.' [11] All
right then, fold up your communism for the time being." A fearful
hullabaloo has recently been raised with this sort of argument in the
form of the "one doctrine" theory. In essence it is the howl of the
die-hards for bourgeois despotism. Out of courtesy, however, we may
simply describe it as totally lacking in common sense.

Communism is at once a complete system of proletarian ideology and a new
social system. It is different from any other ideology or social system,
and is the most complete, progressive, revolutionary and rational system
in human history. The ideological and social system of feudalism has a
place only in the museum of history. The ideological and social system
of capitalism has also become a museum piece in one part of the world
(in the Soviet Union), while in other countries it resembles "a dying
person who is sinking fast, like the sun setting beyond the western
hills", and will soon be relegated to the museum. The communist
ideological and social system alone is full of youth and vitality,
sweeping the world with the momentum of an avalanche and the force of a
thunderbolt. The introduction of scientific communism into China has
opened new vistas for people and has changed the face of the Chinese
revolution. Without communism to guide it, China's democratic revolution
cannot possibly succeed, let alone move on to the next stage. This is
the reason why the bourgeois die-hards are so loudly demanding that
communism be "folded up". But it must not be "folded up", for once
communism is "folded up", China will be doomed. The whole world today
depends on communism for its salvation, and China is no exception.

Everybody knows that the Communist Party has an immediate and a future
programme, a minimum and a maximum programme, with regard to the social
system it advocates. For the present period, New Democracy, and for the
future, socialism; these are two parts of an organic whole, guided by
one and the same communist ideology. Is it not, therefore, in the
highest degree absurd to clamour for communism to be "folded up" on the
ground that the Communist Party's minimum programme is in basic
agreement with the political tenets of the Three People's Principles? It
is precisely because of this basic agreement between the two that we
Communists find it possible to recognize "the Three People's Principles
as the political basis for the anti-Japanese united front" and to
acknowledge that "the Three People's Principles being what China needs
today, our Party is ready to fight for their complete realization";
otherwise no such possibility would exist. Here we have a united front
between communism and the Three People's Principles in the stage of the
democratic revolution, the kind of united front Dr. Sun Yat-sen had in
mind when he said: "communism is the good friend of the Three People's
Principles."[12] To reject communism is in fact to reject the united
front. The die-hards have concocted absurd arguments for the rejection
of communism. Just because they want to reject the united front and
practice their one-party doctrine.

Moreover, the "one doctrine" theory is an absurdity. So long as classes
exist, there will be as many doctrines as there are classes, and even
various groups in the same class may have their different doctrines.
Since the feudal class has a feudal doctrine, the bourgeoisie a
capitalist doctrine, the Buddhists Buddhism, the Christians Christianity
and the peasants polytheism, and since in recent years, some people have
also advocated Kemalism, fascism, vitalism,[13] the "doctrine of
distribution according to labour",[14] and what not, why then cannot the
proletariat have its communism? Since there are countless "isms", why
should the cry of "Fold it up !" be raised at the sight of communism
alone? Frankly, "folding it up" will not work. Let us rather have a
contest. If communism is beaten, we Communists will admit defeat in good
grace. But if not, then let all that stuff about "one doctrine", which
violates the Principle of Democracy, be "folded up" as soon as possible.

To avoid misunderstanding and for the edification of the die-hards, it
is necessary to show clearly where the Three People's Principles and
communism do coincide and where they do not.

Comparison of the two reveals both similarities and differences.

First for the similarities. They are to be found in the basic political
programme of both doctrines during the stage of the bourgeois-democratic
revolution in China. The three political tenets of the revolutionary
Three People's Principles of Nationalism, Democracy and the People's
Livelihood as reinterpreted by Dr. Sun Yat-sen in 1924 are basically
similar to the communist political programme for the stage of the
democratic revolution in China. Because of these similarities and
because of the carrying out of the Three People's Principles, the united
front of the two doctrines and the two parties came into existence. It
is wrong to ignore this aspect.

Next for the differences. (1) There is a difference in part of the
programme for the stage of the democratic revolution. The communist
programme for the whole course of the democratic revolution includes
full rights for the people, the eight-hour working day and a thorough
agrarian revolution, whereas the Three People's Principles do not.
Unless these points are added to the Three People's Principles and there
is the readiness to carry them out, the two democratic programmes are
only basically the same and cannot be described as altogether the same.
(2) Another difference is that one includes the stage of the socialist
revolution, and the other does not. Communism envisages the stage of the
socialist revolution beyond the stage of the democratic revolution, and
hence, beyond its minimum programme it has a maximum programme, _i.e.,_
the programme for the attainment of socialism and communism. The Three
People's Principles which envisage only the stage of the democratic
revolution and not the stage of the socialist revolution have only a
minimum programme and not a maximum programme, _i.e.,_ they have no
programme for the establishment of socialism and communism. (3) There is
the difference in world outlook. The world outlook of communism is
dialectical and historical materialism, while the Three People's
Principles explain history in terms of the people's livelihood, which in
essence is a dualist or idealist outlook; the two world outlooks are
opposed to each other .(4) There is the difference in revolutionary
thoroughness. With communists, theory and practice go together, _i.e.;_
communists possess revolutionary thoroughness. With the followers of the
Three People's Principles, except for those completely loyal to the
revolution and to truth, theory and practice do not go together and
their deeds contradict their words, _i.e.,_ they lack revolutionary
thoroughness. The above are the differences between the two. They
distinguish communists from the followers of the Three People's
Principles. It is undoubtedly very wrong to ignore this distinction and
see only the aspect of unity and not of contradiction.

Once all this is understood, it is easy to see what the bourgeois
die-hards have in mind when they demand that communism be "folded up".
If it does not mean bourgeois despotism, then there is no sense to it at
all.

X. THE THREE PEOPLE'S PRINCIPLES, OLD AND NEW

The bourgeois die-hards have no understanding whatsoever of historical
change; their knowledge is so poor that it is practically nonexistent.
They do not know the difference either between communism and the Three
People's Principles or between the new Three People's principles and the
old.

We Communists recognize "the Three People's Principles as the political
basis for the Anti-Japanese National United Front", we acknowledge that
"the Three People's Principles being what China needs today, our Party
is ready to fight for their complete realization" and we admit the basic
agreement between the communist minimum programme and the political
tenets of the Three People's Principles. But which kind of Three
People's Principles? The Three People's Principles as reinterpreted by
Dr. Sun Yat-sen in the Manifesto of the First National Congress of the
Kuomintang, and no other. I wish the die-hard gentlemen would spare a
moment from the work of "restricting communism", "corroding communism"
and "combating communism", in which they are so gleefully engaged, to
glance through this manifesto. In the manifesto Dr. Sun Yat-sen said:
"Here is the true interpretation of the Kuomintang's Three People's
Principles." Hence these are the only genuine Three People's Principles
and all others are spurious. The only "true interpretation" of the Three
People's Principles is the one contained in the Manifesto of the First
National Congress of the Kuomintang, and all other interpretations are
false. Presumably this is no Communist fabrication, for many Kuomintang
members and I myself personally witnessed the adoption of the manifesto.

The manifesto marks off the two epochs in the history of the Three
People's Principles. Before it, they belonged to the old category; they
were the Three People's Principles of the old bourgeois-democratic
revolution in a semi-colony, the Three People's Principles of old
democracy, the old Three People's Principles.

After it, they came within the new category; they became the Three
People's Principles of the new bourgeois-democratic revolution in a
semi-colony, the Three People's Principles of New Democracy, the new
Three People's Principles. These and these alone are the revolutionary
Three People's Principles of the new period.

The revolutionary Three People's Principles of the new period, the new
or genuine Three People's Principles, embody the Three Great Policies of
alliance with Russia, co-operation with the Communist Party and
assistance to the peasants and workers. Without each and every one of
these Three Great Policies, the Three People's Principles become either
false or incomplete in the new period.

In the first place, the revolutionary, new or genuine Three People's
Principles must include alliance with Russia. As things are today, it is
perfectly clear that unless there is the policy of alliance with Russia,
with the land of socialism, there will inevitably be a policy of
alliance with imperialism, with the imperialist powers. Is this not
exactly what happened after 1927? Once the conflict between the
socialist Soviet Union and the imperialist powers grows sharper, China
will have to take her stand on one side or the other. This is an
inevitable trend. Is it possible to avoid leaning to either side? No,
that is an illusion The whole world will be swept into one or the other
of these two fronts, and "neutrality" will then be merely a deceptive
term. Especially is this true of China which, fighting an imperialist
power that has penetrated deep into her territory, cannot conceive of
ultimate victory without the assistance of the Soviet Union. If alliance
with Russia is sacrificed for the sake of alliance with imperialism, the
word "revolutionary" will have to be expunged from the Three People's
Principles, which will then become reactionary. In the last analysis,
there can be no "neutral" Three People's Principles; they can only be
either revolutionary or counter-revolutionary. Would it not be more
heroic to "fight against attacks from both sides"[15] as Wang Ching-wei
once remarked, and to have the kind of Three People's Principles that
serves this "fight"? Unfortunately, even its inventor Wang Chingwei
himself has abandoned (or "folded up") this kind of Three People's
Principles, for he has adopted the Three People's Principles of alliance
with imperialism. If it is argued that there is a difference between
Eastern and Western imperialism, and that, unlike Wang Ching-wei who has
allied himself with Eastern imperialism, one should ally oneself with
some of the Western imperialists to march eastward and attack, then
would not such conduct be quite revolutionary? However, whether you like
it or not, the Western imperialists are determined to oppose the Soviet
Union and communism, and if you ally yourself with them, they will ask
you to march northward and attack, and your revolution will come to
nothing. All these circumstances make it essential for the
revolutionary, new and genuine Three People's Principles to include
alliance with Russia, and under no circumstances alliance with
imperialism against Russia.

In the second place, the revolutionary, new and genuine Three People's
Principles must include co-operation with the Communist Party. Either
you co-operate with the Communist Party or you oppose it. Opposition to
communism is the policy of the Japanese imperialists and Wang Ching-wei,
and if that is what you want, very well, they will invite you to join
their Anti-Communist Company. But wouldn't that look suspiciously like
turning traitor? You may say, "I am not following Japan, but some other
country." That is just ridiculous. No matter whom you follow, the moment
you oppose the Communist Party you become a traitor, because you can no
longer resist Japan. If you say, "I am going to oppose the Communist
Party independently", that is arrant nonsense. How can the "heroes" in a
colony or semi-colony tackle a counter-revolutionary job of this
magnitude without depending on the strength of imperialism? For ten long
years, virtually all the imperialist forces in the world were enlisted
against the Communist Party, but in vain. How can you suddenly oppose it
"independently"? Some people outside the Border Region, we are told, are
now saying "Opposing the Communist Party is good, but you can never
succeed in it." This remark, if it is not simply hearsay, is only half
wrong, for what "good" is there in opposing the Communist Party? But the
other half is true, you certainly can "never succeed in it". Basically,
the reason lies not with the Communists but with the common people, who
like the Communist Party and do not like "opposing" it. If you oppose
the Communist Party at a juncture when our national enemy is penetrating
deep into our territory, the people will be after your hide; they will
certainly show you no mercy. This much is certain, whoever wants to
oppose the Communist Party must be prepared to be ground to dust. If you
are not keen on being ground to dust, you had certainly better drop this
opposition. This is our sincere advice to all the anti-Communist
"heroes". Thus it is as clear as can be that the Three People's
Principles of today must include co-operation with the Communist Party,
or otherwise those Principles will perish. It is a question of life and
death for the Three People's Principles. Co-operating with the Communist
Party, they will survive; opposing the Communist Party, they will
perish. Can anyone prove the contrary?

In the third place, the revolutionary, new and genuine Three People's
Principles must include the policy of assisting the peasants and
workers. Rejection of this policy, failure whole-heartedly to assist the
peasants and workers or failure to carry out the behest in Dr. Sun
Yat-sen's Testament to "arouse the masses of the people", amounts to
preparing the way for the defeat of the revolution, and one's own defeat
into the bargain. Stalin has said that _"in essence,_ the national
question is a peasant question".[16] This means that the Chinese
revolution is essentially a peasant revolution and that the resistance
to Japan now going on is essentially peasant resistance. Essentially,
the politics of New Democracy means giving the peasants their rights.
The new and genuine Three People's Principles are essentially the
principles of a peasant revolution. Essentially, mass culture means
raising the cultural level of the peasants. The anti-Japanese war is
essentially a peasant war. We are now living in a time when the
"principle of going up into the hills" [17] applies; meetings, work,
classes, newspaper publication, the writing of books, theatrical
performances--everything is done up in the hills, and all essentially
for the sake of the peasants. And essentially it is the peasants who
provide everything that sustains the resistance to Japan and keeps us
going. By "essentially" we mean basically, not ignoring the other
sections of the people, as Stalin himself has explained. As every
schoolboy knows, 80 per cent of China's population are peasants. So the
peasant problem becomes the basic problem of the Chinese revolution and
the strength of the peasants is the main strength of the Chinese
revolution. In the Chinese population the workers rank second to the
peasants in number. There are several million industrial workers in
China and several tens of millions of handicraft workers and
agricultural labourers. China cannot live without her workers in the
various industries, because they are the producers in the industrial
sector of the economy. And the revolution cannot succeed without the
modern industrial working class, because it is the leader of the Chinese
revolution and is the most revolutionary class. In these circumstances,
the revolutionary, new and genuine Three People's Principles must
include the policy of assisting the peasants and workers. Any other kind
of Three People's Principles which lack this policy, do not give the
peasants and workers whole-hearted assistance or do not carry out the
behest to "arouse the masses of the people"; will certainly perish.

Thus it is clear that there is no future for any Three People's
Principles which depart from the Three Great Policies of alliance with
Russia, co-operation with the Communist Party and assistance to the
peasants and workers. Every conscientious follower of the Three People's
Principles must seriously consider this point.

The Three People's Principles comprising the Three Great Policies --in
other words, the revolutionary, new and genuine Three People's
Principles--are the Three People's Principles of New Democracy, a
development of the old Three People's Principles, a great contribution
of Dr. Sun Yat-sen's and a product of the era in which the Chinese
revolution has become part of the world socialist revolution. It is only
these Three People's Principles which the Chinese Communist Party
regards as "being what China needs today" and for whose "complete
realization" it declares itself pledged "to fight". These are the only
Three People's Principles which are in basic agreement with the
Communist Party's political programme for the stage of democratic
revolution namely, with its minimum programme.

As for the old Three People's Principles, they were a product of the old
period of the Chinese revolution. Russia was then an imperialist power,
and naturally there could be no policy of alliance with her; there was
then no Communist Party in existence in our country, and naturally there
could be no policy of co-operation with it; the movement of the workers
and peasants had not yet revealed its full political significance and
aroused people's attention, and naturally there could be no policy of
alliance with them. Hence the Three Peoples Principles of the period
before the reorganization of the Kuomintang in 1924 belonged to the old
category, and they became obsolete. The Kuomintang could not have gone
forward unless it had developed them into the new Three People's
Principles. Dr. Sun Yat-sen in his wisdom saw this point, secured the
help of the Soviet Union and the Chinese Communist Party and
reinterpreted the Three People's Principles so as to endow them with new
characteristics suited to the times; as a result, a united front was
formed between the Three People's Principles and communism,
Kuomintang-Communist cooperation was established for the first time, the
sympathy of the people of the whole country was won, and the revolution
of 1924-27 was launched.

The old Three People's Principles were revolutionary in the old period
and reflected its historical features. But if the old stuff is repeated
in the new period after the new Three People's Principles have been
established, or alliance with Russia is opposed after the socialist
state has been established, or co-operation with the Communist Party is
opposed after the Communist Party has come into existence, or the policy
of assisting the peasants and workers is opposed after they have
awakened and demonstrated their political strength, then that is
reactionary and shows ignorance of the times. The period of reaction
after 1927 was the result of such ignorance. The old proverb says,
"Whosoever understands the signs of the times is a great man." I hope
the followers of the Three People's Principles today will bear this in
mind.

Were the Three People's Principles to fall within the old category, then
they would have nothing basically in common with the communist minimum
programme, because they would belong to the past and be obsolete. Any
sort of Three People's Principles that oppose Russia, the Communist
Party or the peasants and workers are definitely reactionary; they not
only have absolutely nothing in common with the communist minimum
programme but are the enemy of communism, and there is no common ground
at all. This, too, the followers of the Three People's Principles should
carefully consider.

In any case, people with a conscience will never forsake the new Three
People's Principles until the task of opposing imperialism and feudalism
is basically accomplished. The only ones who do are people like Wang
Ching-wei. No matter how energetically they push their spurious Three
People's Principles which oppose Russia, the Communist Party and the
peasants and workers, there will surely be no lack of people with a
conscience and sense of justice who will continue to support Sun
Yat-sen's genuine Three People's Principles. Many followers of the
genuine Three People's Principles continued the struggle for the Chinese
revolution even after the reaction of 1927, and their numbers will
undoubtedly swell to tens upon tens of thousands now that the national
enemy has penetrated deep into our territory. We Communists will always
persevere in long-term co-operation with all the true followers of the
Three People's Principles and, while rejecting the traitors and the
sworn enemies of communism, will never forsake any of our friends.

XI. THE CULTURE OF NEW DEMOCRACY

In the foregoing we have explained the historical characteristics of
Chinese politics in the new period and the question of the
new-democratic republic. We can now proceed to the question of culture.

A given culture is the ideological reflection of the politics and
economics of a given society. There is in China an imperialist culture
which is a reflection of imperialist rule, or partial rule, in the
political and economic fields. This culture is fostered not only by the
cultural organizations run directly by the imperialists in China but by
a number of Chinese who have lost all sense of shame. Into this category
falls all culture embodying a slave ideology. China also has a
semi-feudal culture which reflects her semi-feudal politics and economy,
and whose exponents include all those who advocate the worship of
Confucius, the study of the Confucian canon, the old ethical code and
the old ideas in opposition to the new culture and new ideas.
Imperialist culture and semi-feudal culture are devoted brothers and
have formed a reactionary cultural alliance against China's new culture.
This kind of reactionary culture serves the imperialists and the feudal
class and must be swept away. Unless it is swept away, no new culture of
any kind can be built up. There is no construction without destruction,
no flowing without damming and no motion without rest; the two are
locked in a life-and-death struggle.

As for the new culture, it is the ideological reflection of the new
politics and the new economy which it sets out to serve.

As we have already stated in Section 3, Chinese society has gradually
changed in character since the emergence of a capitalist economy in
China; it is no longer an entirely feudal but a semi-feudal society,
although the feudal economy still predominates. Compared with the feudal
economy, this capitalist economy is a new one. The political forces of
the bourgeoisie, the petty bourgeoisie and the proletariat are the new
political forces which have emerged and grown simultaneously with this
new capitalist economy. And the new culture reflects these new economic
and political forces in the field of ideology and serves them. Without
the capitalist economy, without the bourgeoisie, the petty bourgeoisie
and the proletariat, and without the political forces of these classes,
the new ideology or new culture could not have emerged.

These new political, economic and cultural forces are all revolutionary
forces which are opposed to the old politics, the old economy and the
old culture. The old is composed of two parts, one being China's own
semi-feudal politics, economy and culture, and the other the politics,
economy and culture of imperialism, with the latter heading the
alliance. Both are bad and should be completely destroyed. The struggle
between the new and the old in Chinese society is a struggle between the
new forces of the people (the various revolutionary classes) and the old
forces of imperialism and the feudal class. It is a struggle between
revolution and counter-revolution. This struggle has lasted a full
hundred years if dated from the Opium War, and nearly thirty years if
dated from the Revolution of 1911.

But as already indicated, revolutions too can be classified into old and
new, and what is new in one historical period becomes old in another.
The century of China's bourgeois-democratic revolution can be divided
into two main stages, a first stage of eighty years and a second of
twenty years. Each has its basic historical characteristics: China's
bourgeois-democratic revolution in the first eighty years belongs to the
old category, while in the last twenty years, owing to the change in the
international and domestic political situation, it belongs to the new
category. Old democracy is the characteristic of the first eighty years.
New Democracy is the characteristic of the last twenty. This distinction
holds good in culture as well as in politics.

How does it manifest itself in the field of culture? We shall explain
this next.

XII. THE HISTORICAL CHARACTERISTICS OF CHINA'S CULTURAL REVOLUTION

On the cultural or ideological front, the two periods preceding and
following the May 4th Movement form two distinct historical periods.

Before the May 4th Movement, the struggle on China's cultural front was
one between the new culture of the bourgeoisie and the old culture of
the feudal class. The struggles between the modern school system and the
imperial examination system,[18] between the new learning and the old
learning, and between Western learning and Chinese learning, were all of
this nature. The so-called modern schools or new learning or Western
learning of that time concentrated mainly (we say mainly, because in
part pernicious vestiges of Chinese feudalism still remained) on the
natural sciences and bourgeois social and political theories, which were
needed by the representatives of the bourgeoisie. At the time, the
ideology of the new learning played a revolutionary role in fighting the
Chinese feudal ideology, and it served the bourgeois-democratic
revolution of the old period. However, because the Chinese bourgeoisie
lacked strength and the world had already entered the era of
imperialism, this bourgeois ideology was only able to last out a few
rounds and was beaten back by the reactionary alliance of the enslaving
ideology of foreign imperialism and the "back to the ancients" ideology
of Chinese feudalism; as soon as this reactionary ideological alliance
started a minor counter-offensive, the so-called new learning lowered
its banners, muffled its drums and beat a retreat, retaining its outer
form but losing its soul. The old bourgeois-democratic culture became
enervated and decayed in the era of imperialism, and its failure was
inevitable.

But since the May 4th Movement things have been different. A brand-new
cultural force came into being in China, that is, the communist culture
and ideology guided by the Chinese Communists, or the communist world
outlook and theory of social revolution. The May 4th Movement occurred
in 1919, and in 1921 came the founding of the Chinese Communist Party
and the real beginning of China's labour movement--all in the wake of
the First World War and the October Revolution, _i.e._, at a time when
the national problem and the colonial revolutionary movements of the
world underwent a change, and the connection between the Chinese
revolution and the world revolution became quite obvious. The new
political force of the proletariat and the Communist Party entered the
Chinese political arena, and as a result, the new cultural force, in new
uniform and with new weapons, mustering all possible allies and
deploying its ranks in battle array, launched heroic attacks on
imperialist culture and feudal culture. This new force has made great
strides in the domain of the social sciences and of the arts and
letters, whether of philosophy, economics, political science, military
science, history, literature or art (including the theatre, the cinema,
music, sculpture and painting). For the last twenty years, wherever this
new cultural force has directed its attack, a great revolution has taken
place both in ideological content and in form (for example, in the
written language). Its influence has been so great and its impact so
powerful that it is invincible wherever it goes. The numbers it has
rallied behind it have no parallel in Chinese history. Lu Hsun was the
greatest and the most courageous standard-bearer of this new cultural
force. The chief commander of China's cultural revolution, he was not
only a great man of letters but a great thinker and revolutionary. Lu
Hsun was a man of unyielding integrity, free from all sycophancy or
obsequiousness; this quality is invaluable among colonial and
semi-colonial peoples. Representing the great majority of the nation, Lu
Hsun breached and stormed the enemy citadel; on the cultural front he
was the bravest and most correct, the firmest, the most loyal and the
most ardent national hero, a hero without parallel in our history. The
road he took was the very road of China's new national culture.

Prior to the May 4th Movement, China's new culture was a culture of the
old-democratic kind and part of the capitalist cultural revolution of
the world bourgeoisie. Since the May 4th Movement, it has become
new-democratic and part of the socialist cultural revolution of the
world proletariat.

Prior to the May 4th Movement, China's new cultural movement, her
cultural revolution, was led by the bourgeoisie, which still had a
leading role to play. After the May 4th Movement, its culture and
ideology became even more backward than its politics and were incapable
of playing any leading role; at most, they could serve to a certain
extent as an ally during revolutionary periods, while inevitably the
responsibility for leading the alliance rested on proletarian culture
and ideology. This is an undeniable fact.

The new-democratic culture is the anti-imperialist and anti-feudal
culture of the broad masses; today it is the culture of the
anti-Japanese united front. This culture can be led only by the culture
and ideology of the proletariat, by the ideology of communism, and not
by the culture and ideology of any other class. In a word,
new-democratic culture is the proletarian-led, anti-imperialist and
anti-feudal culture of the broad masses.

XIII. THE FOUR PERIODS

A cultural revolution is the ideological reflection of the political and
economic revolution and is in their service. In China there is a united
front in the cultural as in the political revolution.

The history of the united front in the cultural revolution during the
last twenty years can be divided into four periods. The first covers the
two years from 1919 to 1921, the second the six years from 1921 to 1927,
the third the ten years from 1927 to 1937, and the fourth the three
years from 1937 to the present.

The first period extended from the May 4th Movement of 1919 to the
founding of the Chinese Communist Party in 1921. The May 4th Movement
was its chief landmark.

The May 4th Movement was an anti-imperialist as well as an anti-feudal
movement. Its outstanding historical significance is to be seen in a
feature which was absent from the Revolution of 1911, namely, its
thorough and uncompromising opposition to imperialism as well as to
feudalism. The May 4th Movement possessed this quality because
capitalism had developed a step further in China and because new hopes
had arisen for the liberation of the Chinese nation as China's
revolutionary intellectuals saw the collapse of three great imperialist
powers, Russia, Germany and Austria-Hungary, and the weakening of two
others, Britain and France, while the Russian proletariat had
established a socialist state and the German, Hungarian and Italian
proletariat had risen in revolution. The May 4th Movement came into
being at the call of the world revolution, of the Russian Revolution and
of Lenin. It was part of the world proletarian revolution of the time.
Although the Communist Party had not yet come into existence, there were
already large numbers of intellectuals who approved of the Russian
Revolution and had the rudiments of Communist ideology. In the beginning
the May 4th Movement was the revolutionary movement of a united front of
three sections of people--communist intellectuals, revolutionary
petty-bourgeois intellectuals and bourgeois intellectuals (the last
forming the right wing of the movement). Its shortcoming was that it was
confined to the intellectuals and that the workers and peasants did not
join in. But as soon as it developed into the June 3rd Movement, [19]
not only the intellectuals but the mass of the proletariat, the petty
bourgeoisie and the bourgeoisie joined in, and it became a nation-wide
revolutionary movement. The cultural revolution ushered in by the May
4th Movement was uncompromising in its opposition to feudal culture;
there had never been such a great and thoroughgoing cultural revolution
since the dawn of Chinese history. Raising aloft the two great banners
of the day, "Down with the old ethics and up with the new!" and "Down
with the old literature and up with the new!", the cultural revolution
had great achievements to its credit. At that time it was not yet
possible for this cultural movement to become widely diffused among the
workers and peasants. The slogan of "Literature for the common people"
was advanced, but in fact the "common people" then could only refer to
the petty-bourgeois and bourgeois intellectuals in the cities, that is,
the urban intelligentsia. Both in ideology and in the matter of cadres,
the May 4th Movement paved the way for the founding of the Chinese
Communist Party in 1921 and for the May 30th Movement in 1925 and the
Northern Expedition. The bourgeois intellectuals, who constituted the
right wing of the May 4th Movement, mostly compromised with the enemy in
the second period and went over to the side of reaction.

In the second period, whose landmarks were the founding of the Chinese
Communist Party, the May 30th Movement and the Northern Expedition, the
united front of the three classes formed in the May 4th Movement was
continued and expanded, the peasantry was drawn into it and a political
united front of all these classes, the first instance of
Kuomintang-Communist co-operation, was established. Dr. Sun Yat-sen was
a great man not only because he led the great Revolution of 1911
(although it was only a democratic revolution of the old period), but
also because, "adapting himself to the trends of the world and meeting
the needs of the masses", he had the capacity to bring forward the
revolutionary Three Great Policies of alliance with Russia, co-operation
with the Communist Party and assistance to the peasants and workers,
give new meaning to the Three People's Principles and thus institute the
new Three People's Principles with their Three Great Policies.
Previously, the Three People's Principles had exerted little influence
on the educational and academic world or with the youth, because they
had not raised the issues of opposition to imperialism or to the feudal
social system and feudal culture and ideology. They were the old Three
People's Principles which people regarded as the time-serving banner of
a group of men bent on seizing power, in other words, on securing
official positions, a banner used purely for political maneuvering. Then
came the new Three People's Principles with their Three Great Policies.
The co-operation between the Kuomintang and the Communist Party and the
joint efforts of the revolutionary members of the two parties spread the
new Three People's Principles all over China, extending to a section of
the educational and academic world and the mass of student youth. This
was entirely due to the fact that the original Three People's Principles
had developed into the anti-imperialist, anti-feudal and new-democratic
Three People's Principles with their Three Great Policies. Without this
development it would have been impossible to disseminate the ideas of
the Three People's Principles.

During this period, the revolutionary Three People's Principles became
the political basis of the united front of the Kuomintang and the
Communist Party and of all the revolutionary classes, and since
"communism is the good friend of the Three People's Principles", a
united front was formed between the two of them. In terms of social
classes, it was a united front of the proletariat, the peasantry, the
urban petty bourgeoisie and the bourgeoisie. Using the Communist _Weekly
Guide,_ the Kuomintang's _Republican Daily News_ of Shanghai and other
newspapers in various localities as their bases of operations, the two
parties jointly advocated anti-imperialism, jointly combated feudal
education based upon the worship of Confucius and upon the study of the
Confucian canon and jointly opposed feudal literature and the classical
language and promoted the new literature and the vernacular style of
writing with an anti-imperialist and anti-feudal content. During the
wars in Kwangtung and during the Northern Expedition, they reformed
China's armed forces by the inculcation of anti-imperialist and
anti-feudal ideas. The slogans, "Down with the Corrupt officials" and
"Down with the local tyrants and evil gentry", were raised among the
peasant millions, and great peasant revolutionary struggles were
aroused. Thanks to all this and to the assistance of the Soviet Union,
the Northern Expedition was victorious. But no sooner did the big
bourgeoisie climb to power than it put an end to this revolution, thus
creating an entirely new political situation

The third period was the new revolutionary period of 1927-37. As a
change had taken place within the revolutionary camp towards the end of
the second period, with the big bourgeoisie going over to the
counter-revolutionary camp of the imperialist and feudal forces and the
national bourgeoisie trailing after it, only three of the four classes
formerly within the revolutionary camp remained, _i.e._, the
proletariat, the peasantry and the other sections of the petty
bourgeoisie (including the revolutionary intellectuals), and
consequently the Chinese revolution inevitably entered a new period in
which the Chinese Communist Party alone gave leadership to the masses.
This period was one of counter-revolutionary campaigns of "encirclement
and suppression", on the one hand, and of the deepening of the
revolution, on the other. There were two kinds of counter-revolutionary
campaigns of "encirclement and suppression", the military and the
cultural. The deepening of the revolution was of two kinds; both the
agrarian and the cultural revolutions were deepened. At the instigation
of the imperialists, the counter-revolutionary forces of the whole
country and of the whole world were mobilized for both kinds of
campaigns of "encirclement and suppression", which lasted no less than
ten years and were unparalleled in their ruthlessness; hundreds of
thousands of Communists and young students were slaughtered and millions
of workers and peasants suffered cruel persecution. The people
responsible for all this apparently had no doubt that communism and the
Communist Party could be "exterminated once and for all". However, the
outcome was different; both kinds of "encirclement and suppression"
campaigns failed miserably. The military campaign resulted in the
northern march of the Red Army to resist the Japanese, and the cultural
campaign resulted in the outbreak of the December 8th Movement of the
revolutionary youth in 1935. And the common result of both was the
awakening of the people of the whole country. These were three positive
results. The most amazing thing of all was that the Kuomintang's
cultural "encirclement and suppression" campaign failed completely in
the Kuomintang areas as well, although the Communist Party was in an
utterly defenceless position in all the cultural and educational
institutions there. Why did this happen? Does it not give food for
prolonged and deep thought? It was in the very midst of such campaigns
of "encirclement and suppression" that Lu Hsun, who believed in
communism, became the giant of China's cultural revolution

The negative result of the counter-revolutionary campaigns of
"encirclement and suppression" was the invasion of our country by
Japanese imperialism. This is the chief reason why to this very day the
people of the whole country still bitterly detest those ten years of
anti-communism.

In the struggles of this period, the revolutionary side firmly upheld
the people's anti-imperialist and anti-feudal New Democracy and their
new Three People's Principles, while the counter-revolutionary side
under the direction of imperialism, imposed the despotic regime of the
coalition of the landlord class and the big bourgeoisie. That despotic
regime butchered Dr. Sun Yat-sen's Three Great Policies and his new
Three People's Principles both politically and culturally, with
catastrophic consequences to the Chinese nation.

The fourth period is that of the present anti-Japanese war. Pursuing its
zigzag course, the Chinese revolution has again arrived at a united
front of the four classes; but the scope of the united front is now much
broader because its upper stratum includes many members of the ruling
classes, its middle stratum includes the national bourgeoisie and the
petty bourgeoisie, and its lower stratum includes the entire
proletariat, so that the various classes and strata of the nation have
become members of the alliance resolutely resisting Japanese
imperialism. The first stage of this period lasted until the fall of
Wuhan. During that stage, there was a lively atmosphere in the country
in every field politically there was a trend towards democracy and
culturally there was fairly widespread activity. With the fall of Wuhan
the second stage began, during which the political situation has
undergone many changes, with one section of the big bourgeoisie
capitulating to the enemy and another desiring an early end to the War
of Resistance. In the cultural sphere, this situation has been reflected
in the reactionary activities of Yeh Ching, [20] Chang Chun-mai and
others, and in the suppression of freedom of speech and of the press.

To overcome this crisis, a firm struggle is necessary against all ideas
opposed to resistance, unity and progress, and unless these reactionary
ideas are crushed, there will be no hope of victory. How will this
struggle turn out? This is the big question in the minds of the people
of the whole country. Judging by the domestic and international
situation, the Chinese people are bound to win, however numerous the
obstacles on the path of resistance. The progress achieved during the
twenty years since the May 4th Movement exceeds not only that of the
preceding eighty years but virtually surpasses that achieved in the
thousands of years of Chinese history. Can we not visualize what further
progress China will make in another twenty years? The unbridled violence
of all the forces of darkness, whether domestic or foreign, has brought
disaster to our nation; but this very violence indicates that while the
forces of darkness still have some strength left, they are already in
their death throes, and that the people are gradually approaching
victory. This is true of China, of the whole East and of the entire
world.

XIV. SOME WRONG IDEAS ABOUT THE NATURE OF CULTURE

Everything new comes from the forge of hard and bitter struggle. This is
also true of the new culture which has followed a zigzag course in the
past twenty years, during which both the good and the bad were tested
and proved in struggle.

The bourgeois die-hards are as hopelessly wrong on the question of
culture as on that of political power. They neither understand the
historical characteristics of this new period in China, nor recognize
the new-democratic culture of the masses. Their starting point is
bourgeois despotism, which in culture becomes the cultural despotism of
the bourgeoisie. It seems that a section (and I refer only to a section)
of educated people from the so-called European-American school [21] who
in fact supported the Kuomintang government's "Communist suppression"
campaign on the cultural front in the past are now supporting its policy
of "restricting" and "corroding" the Communist Party. They do not want
the workers and the peasants to hold up their heads politically or
culturally. This bourgeois die-hard road of cultural despotism leads
nowhere; as in the case of political despotism, the domestic and
international pre-conditions are lacking. Therefore this cultural
despotism, too, had better be "folded up".

So far as the orientation of our national culture is concerned,
communist ideology plays the guiding role, and we should work hard both
to disseminate socialism and communism throughout the working class and
to educate the peasantry and other sections of the people in socialism
properly and step by step. However, our national culture as a whole is
not yet socialist.

Because of the leadership of the proletariat, the politics, the economy
and the culture of New Democracy all contain an element of socialism,
and by no means a mere casual element but one with a decisive role.
However, taken as a whole, the political, economic and cultural
situation so far is new-democratic and not socialist. For the Chinese
revolution in its present stage is not yet a socialist revolution for
the overthrow of capitalism but a bourgeois-democratic revolution, its
central task being mainly that of combating foreign imperialism and
domestic feudalism. In the sphere of national culture, it is wrong to
assume that the existing national culture is, or should be, socialist in
its entirety. That would amount to confusing the dissemination of
communist ideology with the carrying out of an immediate programme of
action, and to confusing the application of the communist standpoint and
method in investigating problems, undertaking research, handling work
and training cadres with the general policy for national education and
national culture in the democratic stage of the Chinese revolution. A
national culture with a socialist content will necessarily be the
reflection of a socialist politics and a socialist economy. There are
socialist elements in our politics and our economy, and hence these
socialist elements are reflected in our national culture; but taking our
society as a whole, we do not have a socialist politics and a socialist
economy yet, so that there cannot be a wholly socialist national
culture. Since the present Chinese revolution is part of the world
proletarian-socialist revolution, the new culture of China today is part
of the world proletarian-socialist new culture and is its great ally.
While this part contains vital elements of socialist culture, the
national culture as a whole joins the stream of the world
proletarian-socialist new culture not entirely as a socialist culture,
but as the anti-imperialist and anti-feudal new-democratic culture of
the broad masses. And since the Chinese revolution today cannot do
without proletarian leadership, China's new culture cannot do without
the leadership of proletarian culture and ideology, of communist
ideology. At the present stage, however, this kind of leadership means
leading the masses of the people in an anti-imperialist and anti-feudal
political and cultural revolution, and therefore, taken as a whole, the
content of China's new national culture is still not socialist but
new-democratic.

Beyond all doubt, now is the time to spread communist ideas more widely
and put more energy into the study of Marxism-Leninism, or otherwise we
shall not only be unable to lead the Chinese revolution forward to the
future stage of socialism, but shall also be unable to guide the present
democratic revolution to victory. However, we must keep the spreading of
communist ideas and propaganda about the Communist social system
distinct from the practical application of the new-democratic programme
of action; we must also keep the communist theory and method of
investigating problems, undertaking research, handling work and training
cadres distinct from the new democratic line for national culture as a
whole. It is undoubtedly inappropriate to mix the two up.

It can thus be seen that the content of China's new national culture at
the present stage is neither the cultural despotism of the bourgeoisie
nor the socialism of the proletariat, but the anti-imperialist and
anti-feudal New Democracy of the masses, under the leadership of
proletarian-socialist culture and ideology.

XV. A NATIONAL, SCIENTIFIC AND MASS CULTURE

New-democratic culture is national. It opposes imperialist oppression
and upholds the dignity and independence of the Chinese nation. It
belongs to our own nation and bears our own national characteristics. It
links up with the socialist and new-democratic cultures of all other
nations and they are related in such a way that they can absorb
something from each other and help each other to develop, together
forming a new world culture; but as a revolutionary national culture it
can never link up with any reactionary imperialist culture of whatever
nation. To nourish her own culture China needs to assimilate a good deal
of foreign progressive culture, not enough of which was done in the
past. We should assimilate whatever is useful to us today not only from
the present-day socialist and new-democratic cultures but also from the
earlier cultures of other nations, for example, from the culture of the
various capitalist countries in the Age of Enlightenment. However, we
should not gulp any of this foreign material down uncritically, but must
treat it as we do our food--first chewing it, then submitting it to the
working of the stomach and intestines with their juices and secretions,
and separating it into nutriment to be absorbed and waste matter to be
discarded--before it can nourish us. To advocate "wholesale
westernization" [22] is wrong. China has suffered a great deal from the
mechanical absorption of foreign material. Similarly, in applying
Marxism to China, Chinese communists must fully and properly integrate
the universal truth of Marxism with the concrete practice of the Chinese
revolution, or in other words, the universal truth of Marxism must be
combined with specific national characteristics and acquire a definite
national form if it is to be useful, and in no circumstances can it be
applied subjectively as a mere formula. Marxists who make a fetish of
formulas are simply playing the fool with Marxism and the Chinese
revolution, and there is no room for them in the ranks of the Chinese
revolution. Chinese culture should have its own form, its own national
form. National in form and new-democratic in content--such is our new
culture today.

New-democratic culture is scientific. Opposed as it is to all feudal and
superstitious ideas, it stands for seeking truth from facts, for
objective truth and for the unity of theory and practice. On this point,
the possibility exists of a united front against imperialism, feudalism
and superstition between the scientific thought of the Chinese
proletariat and those Chinese bourgeois materialists and natural
scientists who are progressive, but in no case is there a possibility of
a united front with any reactionary idealism. In the field of political
action Communists may form an anti-imperialist and anti-feudal united
front with some idealists and even religious people, but we can never
approve of their idealism or religious doctrines. A splendid old culture
was created during the long period of Chinese feudal society. To study
the development of this old culture, to reject its feudal dross and
assimilate its democratic essence is a necessary condition for
developing our new national culture and increasing our national
self-confidence, but we should never swallow anything and everything
uncritically. It s imperative to separate the fine old culture of the
people which had a more or less democratic and revolutionary character
from all the decadence of the old feudal ruling class. China's present
new politics and new economy have developed out of her old politics and
old economy, and her present new culture, too, has developed out of her
old culture; therefore, we must respect our own history and must not lop
it off. However, respect for history means giving it its proper place as
a science, respecting its dialectical development, and not eulogizing
the past at the expense of the present or praising every drop of feudal
poison. As far as the masses and the young students are concerned, the
essential thing is to guide them to look forward and not backward.

New-democratic culture belongs to the broad masses and is therefore
democratic. It should serve the toiling masses of workers and peasants
who make up more than 90 per cent of the nation's population d should
gradually become their very own. There is a difference of degree, as
well as a close link, between the knowledge imparted to the
revolutionary cadres and the knowledge imparted to the revolutionary
masses, between the raising of cultural standards and popularization.
Revolutionary culture is a powerful revolutionary weapon for the broad
masses of the people. It prepares the ground ideologically before the
revolution comes and is an important, indeed essential, fighting front
in the general revolutionary front during the revolution. People engaged
in revolutionary cultural work are the commanders at various levels on
this cultural front. "Without revolutionary theory there can be no
revolutionary movement"; [23] one can thus see how important the
cultural movement is for the practical revolutionary movement. Both the
cultural and practical movements must be of the masses. Therefore all
progressive cultural workers in the anti-Japanese war must have their
own cultural battalions, that is, the broad masses. A revolutionary
cultural worker who is not close to the people is a commander without an
army, whose fire-power cannot bring the enemy down. To attain this
objective, written Chinese must be reformed, given the requisite
conditions, and our spoken language brought closer to that of the
people, for the people, it must be stressed, are the inexhaustible
source of our revolutionary culture.

A national, scientific and mass culture--such is the anti-imperialist
and anti-feudal culture of the people, the culture of New Democracy, the
new culture of the Chinese nation.

Combine the politics, the economy and the culture of New Democracy, and
you have the new-democratic republic, the Republic of China both in name
and in reality, the new China we want to create.

Behold, New China is within sight. Let us all hail her!

Her masts have already risen above the horizon. Let us all cheer in
welcome!

Raise both your hands. New China is ours!

_NOTES_

1. _Chinese Culture_ was a magazine founded in January 1940 in Yenan;
the present article appeared in the first number.

2. See V. I. Lenin, "Once Again on the Trade Unions, the Present
Situation and the Mistakes of Trotsky and Bukharin", _Selected Works,_
Eng. ed., International Publishers, New York, 1943, Vol. IX, p. 54.

3. Karl Marx, "Preface to A _Contribution to the Critique of Political
Economy", Selected Works of Marx and Engels,_ Eng. ed., FLPH, Moscow,
1958, Vol. I, p. 363

4. Karl Marx, "Theses on Feuerbach", _Selected Works of Marx and
Engels,_ Eng. ed., FLPH, Moscow, 1958, Vol. II, p. 405.

5. J. V. Stalin, "The October Revolution and the National Question",
_Works,_ Eng. ed., FLPH, Moscow, 1953, Vol. IV, pp. 169-70.

6. J. V. Stalin, "The National Question Once Again", _Works,_ Eng. ed.,
FLPH Moscow, 1954, Vol. VII, pp. 225- 27.

7. V. I. Lenin, "Imperialism, the Highest Stage of Capitalism",
_Selected Works_ Eng. ed., FLPH, Moscow, 1950, Vol. I, Part 2, p. 566.

8. These anti-Soviet campaigns were instigated by the Kuomintang
government following Chiang Kai-shek's betrayal of the revolution. On
December 13, 1927, the Kuomintang murdered the Soviet vice-consul in
Canton and on the next day its government in Nanking issued a decree
breaking off relations with Russia, withdrawing official recognition
from Soviet consuls in the provinces and ordering Soviet commercial
establishments to cease activity. In August 1929 Chiang Kai-shek, under
the instigation of the imperialists, organized acts of provocation in
the Northeast against the Soviet Union, which resulted in armed clashes.

9. After World War I the British imperialists instigated their vassal
Greece to commit aggression against Turkey, but the Turkish people, with
the help of the Soviet Union, defeated the Greek troops in 1922. In
1923, Kemal was elected President of Turkey. Stalin said:

A Kemalist revolution is a revolution of the top stratum, a revolution
of the national merchant bourgeoisie, arising in a struggle against the
foreign imperialists, and whose subsequent development is essentially
directed against the peasants and workers, against the very possibility
of an agrarian revolution. ("Talk with Students of the Sun Yat-sen
University", _Works,_ Eng. ed., FLPH Moscow, 1954, Vol. IX, p. 261.)

10. The "metaphysics-mongers" were Chang Chun-mai and his group. After
the May 4th movement, Chang openly opposed science and advocated
metaphysics, or what he called "spiritual culture", and thus came to be
known as a "metaphysics-monger". In order to support Chiang Kai-shek and
the Japanese aggressors, he published an "Open Letter to Mr. Mao
Tse-tung" in December 1938 at Chiang Kai-shek's bidding, wildly
demanding the abolition of the Eighth Route Army, the New Fourth Army
and the Shensi-Kansu-Ningsia Border Region.

11. See the manifesto of the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist
Party on the establishment of Kuomintang-Communist co-operation, issued
in September 1937.

12. See Dr. Sun Yat-sen, _Lectures on the Principle of People's
Livelihood,_ 1924, Lecture II.

13. _Vitalism_ was an exposition of Kuomintang fascism, a hotchpotch
ghostwritten by a number of reactionary hacks for Chen Li-fu, one of the
notorious chiefs of Chiang Kai-shek's secret service.

14. The "doctrine of distribution according to labour" was a
high-sounding slogan shamelessly put forward by Yen Hsi-shan, warlord
and representative of the big landlords and big compradors in Shansi
Province.

15. "Fight Against Attacks from Both Sides" was the title of an article
written by Wang Ching-wei after his betrayal of the revolution in 1927.

16. J V. Stalin, "Concerning the National Question in Yugoslavia", a
speech delivered in the Yugoslav Commission of the E.C.C.I., March 30,
1925. Stalin said:

... the peasantry constitutes the main army of the national movement, .
. . there is no powerful national movement without the peasant army, nor
can there be. That is what is meant when it is said that, _in essence,_
the national question is a peasant question. (_Works_, Eng. ed., FLPH,
Moscow, 1954, Vol. VII, pp. 71-72 )

17. The "principle of going up into the hills" was a dogmatist gibe
against Comrade Mao Tse-tung for his emphasis on rural revolutionary
bases. He makes use of the expression to explain the importance of the
role played by the rural revolutionary bases.

18. The modern school system was the educational system modelled on that
of capitalist countries in Europe and America. The imperial examination
system was the old examination system in feudal China. Towards the end
of the 19^(th) century, enlightened Chinese intellectuals urged the
abolition of the old competitive examination system and the
establishment of modern schools.

19. The June 3rd Movement marked a new stage in the patriotic movement
of May 4. On June 3, 1919, students in Peking held public meetings and
made speeches in defiance of persecution and repression by the army and
police. They went on strike and the strike spread to the workers and
merchants in Shanghai, Nanking, Tientsin, Hangchow, Wuhan and Kiukiang
and in the provinces of Shantung and Anhwei. Thus the May 4th Movement
grew into a broad mass movement in which the proletariat, the urban
petty bourgeoisie and the national bourgeoisie all participated.

20. Yeh Ching was a renegade Communist who became a hired hack in the
Kuomintang secret service.

21. The spokesman of the so-called European-American school was the
counterrevolutionary Hu Shih.

22. Wholesale westernization was the view held by a number of
westernized Chinese bourgeois intellectuals who unconditionally praised
the outmoded individualist bourgeois culture of the West and advocated
the servile imitation of capitalist Europe and America.

23. V. I. Lenin, "What Is to Be Done?", _Collected Works,_ Eng. ed.,
FLPH, Moscow, 1961, Vol. V, p. 369.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcription by the Maoist Documentation Project.
HTML revised 2004 by Marxists.org

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Selected Works of Mao Tse-tung

Save
